Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 1. Cigarette Tax Act.

Sec. 43.50.010.
License.

A person may not sell, purchase, possess, or acquire cigarettes as a manufacturer, distributor, direct-buying retailer, vending machine operator, or buyer without a license.

The department, upon application and payment of the fee, shall issue a license to each manufacturer, distributor, direct-buying retailer, vending machine operator, or buyer. The department shall adopt reasonable regulations that it considers necessary in respect to the application for and the issuance of licenses.

The department may refuse to issue a license if there is reasonable cause to believe that the applicant has wilfully withheld information requested to determine the applicant’s eligibility to receive a license, or if there is reasonable cause to believe that information submitted in the application is false or misleading and is not made in good faith.

A license required by AS

43.50.010

—

43.50.180

is in addition to any other license required by law.

A license issued under AS

43.50.010

—

43.50.180

must include

the name and address of the licensee;

the type of business to be conducted; and

the year for which the license is issued.

History.

(§ 3 ch 187 SLA 1955; am § 38 ch 113 SLA 1980)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 15 AAC 50, art. 1.

Sec. 43.50.020.
Separate licenses.

If a person operates more than one place of business, the person must obtain a separate license for each place of business, except that a person operating one or more cigarette vending machines is considered to have only one place of business for the purpose of a license under AS

43.50.010

—

43.50.180

.
A person licensed only as a manufacturer, distributor, direct-buying retailer, vending machine operator, or buyer may not operate in another capacity unless the appropriate license for it is first secured.
Each license shall be exhibited at the place of business for which it is issued and in the manner prescribed by the department.

History.

(§ 4 ch 187 SLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 15 AAC 50, art. 1.

Sec. 43.50.030.
License fees.

For each license issued to a manufacturer, and for each renewal, the fee is $50.

For each license issued to a distributor or wholesaler-distributor, and for each renewal, the fee is $50.

For each license issued to a vending machine operator, and for each renewal, the fee is $50.

For each license issued to a direct-buying retailer, and for each renewal, the fee is $50.

For each license issued to a buyer, and for each renewal, the fee is $25.

A license may not be issued except upon the payment of the fee notwithstanding a statute or exemption to the contrary.

History.

(§ 5 ch 187 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 47 SLA 1964; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 1 FSSLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 15 AAC 50, art. 1.

Sec. 43.50.035.
Wholesaler-distributor license.

A person outside of this state who sells or distributes cigarettes into this state and is not required to be licensed under AS

43.50.010

may apply for a wholesaler-distributor license.

A person outside of this state who sells or distributes cigarettes into this state, who is not required to be licensed under AS

43.50.010

, and who wishes to purchase stamps under this chapter is required to be licensed as a wholesaler-distributor.

The department shall adopt reasonable regulations necessary for the collection of cigarette taxes on cigarette sales or distributions made by a wholesaler-distributor licensee into this state and standards for

application and issuance of the license; and

refusal to issue the license.

History.

(§ 2 ch 47 SLA 1964; am § 3 ch 109 SLA 2003; am § 5 ch 1 FSSLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 15 AAC 50, art. 1.

Sec. 43.50.040.
Expiration of licenses.

A license issued under AS

43.50.010

or

43.50.035

expires on June 30 following the date of issue. If a license is revoked, or the business for which the license is issued changes ownership or the licensee changes the place of business from the premises covered by the license, the licensee shall immediately return the license to the department. If the licensee moves the business to another location in the state, the license shall, upon the payment of a fee of 50 cents, be reissued for the new location for the balance of the unexpired term. Before a license issued under AS

43.50.010

or

43.50.035

expires, the licensee may apply to renew the license for one year from the expiration date of the license. The renewal fee required by AS

43.50.030

must accompany the application. The department shall adopt reasonable regulations that it considers necessary regarding the renewal of licenses.

History.

(§ 6 ch 187 SLA 1955; am § 4 ch 109 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 15 AAC 50, art. 1.

Sec. 43.50.050.
Transfer of licenses.

A license is not assignable or transferable. However in the case of death, bankruptcy, receivership, or incompetency of the licensee, or if the business of the licensee is transferred to another by operation of law, the department may extend the license for a limited time to the executor, administrator, trustee, receiver, or the transferee.

History.

(§ 7 ch 187 SLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 15 AAC 50, art. 1.

Sec. 43.50.060.
Refunds.

The department may not refund the license fee upon the surrender or revocation of a license.
The department may refund a license fee that is paid or collected in error.
If a license is lost, destroyed, or defaced, the department may issue a duplicate license upon payment of a fee of 50 cents.

History.

(§ 8 ch 187 SLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 15 AAC 50, art. 1.

Sec. 43.50.070.
Suspension or revocation of or refusal to renew a license.

The department may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license issued under this chapter (1) for a negligent violation of AS

11.76.100

,

11.76.106

,

11.76.107

,

11.76.109

, or a violation of this chapter or a regulation of the department adopted under this chapter; (2) if a licensee ceases to act in the capacity for which the license was issued; or (3) if a licensee negligently sells tobacco or products containing tobacco to a person who is required to, but does not, hold a license endorsement under AS

43.70.075

or whose license endorsement under AS

43.70.075

has been suspended. A person whose license is suspended or revoked may not sell cigarettes or tobacco products, or permit cigarettes or tobacco products to be sold, during the period of the suspension or revocation on the premises occupied or controlled by that person. A disciplinary proceeding or action is not barred or abated by the expiration, transfer, surrender, renewal, or extension of a license issued under this chapter. The department shall comply with the provisions of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), except that a hearing officer of the department, rather than a hearing officer assigned under AS

44.62.350

, may conduct hearings.

In this section, “licensee” means a person licensed under AS

43.50.010

—

43.50.180

or

43.50.300

—

43.50.390

.

History.

(§ 9 ch 187 SLA 1955; am § 4 ch 125 SLA 1990; am § 5 ch 113 SLA 1992; am § 5 ch 135 SLA 1998; am §§ 5, 6 ch 109 SLA 2003; am § 11 ch 57 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 15 AAC 50, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, in (a), inserted “11.76.109,” at the end of the citation list.

Sec. 43.50.080.
Returns. [Repealed, § 20 ch 109 SLA 2003.]

Sec. 43.50.090.
Tax imposed.

There is levied an excise tax of 38 mills on each cigarette imported or acquired in the state. The tax shall be paid through the use of stamps as provided in AS

43.50.500

—

43.50.700

. A person who imports or acquires cigarettes in the state upon which a stamp required by this chapter has not been affixed in accordance with AS

43.50.500

—

43.50.700

, who fails to apply to purchase stamps as required by AS

43.50.540(a)

, and who fails to pay the tax through the use of stamps is not relieved of the obligation to pay taxes due under this chapter. The person shall still pay the tax, and the tax is due on or before the end of the month following the month in which cigarettes were manufactured, imported, acquired, or sold in this state. Cigarettes upon which the excise is imposed are not again subject to the excise when acquired by another person.

It is the intent and purpose of this section to provide for the collection of this excise from the person who first acquires the cigarettes in this state.

The tax imposed under (a) of this section does not apply to cigarettes imported or acquired in the state by an exchange, commissary, or ship’s stores operated by one of the uniformed services of the United States as defined in 5 U.S.C. 2101.

The tax imposed under (a) of this section does not apply to the first 400 cigarettes personally transported into the state by an individual for that individual’s personal consumption during the calendar month.

History.

(§ 11 ch 187 SLA 1955; am § 5 ch 94 SLA 1977; am § 2 ch 48 SLA 1997; am §§ 7, 8 ch 109 SLA 2003; am §§ 6, 7 ch 1 FSSLA 2004)

Contingent amendment of subsection (a). —

Under secs. 3, 7, and 10,
ch. 48, SLA 1997, the rate in subsection (a) is modified on the later of (1) the date a court enters a final judgment that the amendment made to subsection (a) by sec. 2,
ch. 48, SLA 1997 changing the rate of taxation on cigarettes violates the prohibition set out in
art. IX, sec. 7, Constitution of the State of Alaska, against dedication of the proceeds of a state tax or license, and (2) the expiration of any time for appeal of that judgment, or upon entry of a final order on the appeal that subsection (a), as amended by sec. 2,
ch. 48, SLA 1997, violates
art. IX, sec. 7, Constitution of the State of Alaska. Section 42, ch. 1, FSSLA 2004 contingently sets the modified rates of taxation on cigarettes under
AS

43.50.190(a)

at 77.5 mills after December 31, 2004, and before July 1, 2006; at 87.5 mills after June 30, 2006, and before July 1, 2007; and at 97.5 mills after June 30, 2007.
Under sec. 8,
ch. 48, SLA 1997, if this contingent amendment of
AS

43.50.190(a)

takes effect, the contingent amendment is retroactive to October 1, 1997, and 35.5 mills per cigarette of the tax levied after October 1, 1997 under subsection (a) of this section, as amended by sec. 2,
ch. 48, SLA 1997, shall be credited to the tax levied under
AS 43.50.190(a), as contingently amended by sec. 4,
ch. 48, SLA 1997, and sec. 42, ch. 1, FSSLA 2004. As of May 2022, the contingencies had not been satisfied.

Cross references. —

For legislative intent concerning the 1997 amendment of this section, see § 1, ch. 48, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For taxation, see 15 AAC 50, art. 2.

Sec. 43.50.100.
Unlicensed possession or sale.

[Repealed, § 45 ch 113 SLA 1980.]

[Repealed, § 3 ch 166 SLA 1976.]

[Repealed, § 45 ch 113 SLA 1980.]

A person or licensee who is in control or possession of cigarettes contrary to this chapter or who offers to sell or dispose of cigarettes to others for the purpose of resale without being licensed to do so is considered to have possession of the cigarettes as a consumer and is personally liable for the cigarette taxes imposed by this chapter, plus a penalty of 100 percent.

[Repealed, § 45 ch 113 SLA 1980.]

History.

(§ 12 ch 187 SLA 1955; am § 4 ch 47 SLA 1964; am § 3 ch 166 SLA 1976; am § 45 ch 113 SLA 1980; am § 9 ch 109 SLA 2003)

Cross references. —

For present provisions concerning civil penalties, see AS

43.05.220

.

Sec. 43.50.105.
Restrictions on shipping or transporting cigarettes.

A person who is not licensed under this chapter may not ship or cause to be shipped cigarettes to a person in this state unless the person receiving the cigarettes is

licensed under this chapter;

an operator of a customs bonded warehouse under 19 U.S.C. 1311 or 19 U.S.C. 1555; or

an instrumentality of the federal government or an Indian tribal organization authorized by law to possess cigarettes not taxed under this chapter.

A person who is licensed under this chapter may not ship or cause to be shipped cigarettes to a person in this state unless the person receiving the cigarettes

is licensed under this chapter;

holds a business license endorsement under AS

43.70.075

;

is an operator of a customs bonded warehouse under 19 U.S.C. 1311 or 19 U.S.C. 1555;

is an instrumentality of the federal government or an Indian tribal organization authorized by law to possess cigarettes not taxed under this chapter; or

is an individual 19 years of age or older receiving the cigarettes for personal consumption and the tax imposed on the cigarettes under this chapter has been paid.

A common or contract carrier may not knowingly transport cigarettes to a person in this state unless the person

shipping the cigarettes is licensed under this chapter and, before shipment, provides the common or contract carrier with a copy of the person’s current license issued by the department and an affidavit from the intended recipient certifying that the person receiving the cigarettes is a person described under (b)(1) — (5) of this section; or

receiving the cigarettes is a person described under (a)(2) or (3) of this section or is licensed under this chapter and, before receipt, provides the common or contract carrier with a copy of the person’s current license issued by the department.

If the cigarettes are transported by a common or contract carrier to a home or residence, it is rebuttably presumed that the common or contract carrier knew that the person receiving the cigarettes was not a person described under (b)(1) — (5) of this section, unless the person shipping the cigarettes has satisfied the requirements in (c)(1) of this section.

A person, other than a common or contract carrier, may not knowingly transport cigarettes to a person in this state, unless the person receiving the cigarettes is a person described under (b)(1) — (5) of this section.

A person who ships or causes to be shipped cigarettes to a person in this state shall plainly and visibly mark the container or wrapping with the word “cigarettes” if the cigarettes are shipped in a container or wrapping other than the cigarette manufacturer’s original container or wrapping.

A person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a

class A misdemeanor if the person unlawfully ships, causes to be shipped, or transports at least one but fewer than 5,000 cigarettes;

class C felony if the person unlawfully ships, causes to be shipped, or transports 5,000 or more cigarettes.

In addition to the criminal penalty under (g) of this section, the department may assess a civil fine of not more than $5,000 for each violation of this section.

A person who violates the provisions of this section is jointly and severally liable for the taxes imposed by AS

43.50.090

and

43.50.190

. To the fullest extent permitted by the Constitution of the United States, a person who violates the provisions of this section is required to collect the taxes and pay them to the department.

History.

(§ 10 ch 109 SLA 2003; am §§ 8 — 13 ch 1 FSSLA 2004; am § 12 ch 57 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For punishment for class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, in (b)(2), substituted “business license” for “tobacco”.

Sec. 43.50.110.
Taxpayer’s remedies. [Repealed, § 3 ch 166 SLA 1976.
For current law, see AS 43.05.240.]

Sec. 43.50.120.
Lien. [Repealed, § 4 ch 94 SLA 1976.
For current law, see AS 43.10.035.]

Sec. 43.50.130.
Records.

A licensee shall keep a complete and accurate record of all cigarettes manufactured, purchased, or acquired. The records, except in the case of a manufacturer, must include a written statement containing the name and address of the seller and the purchaser, the date of delivery, the quantity of cigarettes, the trade name and brand, and the price paid for each brand of cigarettes purchased. The licensee shall keep such other records as the department prescribes. All statements and records required by this section shall be in the form prescribed by the department, shall be preserved for three years, and shall be offered for inspection upon demand by the department.

A licensee may not issue or accept a written statement that falsely indicates the name of the customer, the type of merchandise, the price, the discounts, or the terms of sale.

Where an invoice is given or accepted by a licensee

a statement that makes the invoice a false record of the transaction may not be inserted in the invoice; and

a statement that should be included in the invoice may not be omitted from the invoice if the invoice does not reflect the transaction involved without the statement.

An invoice for the sale of cigarettes given or accepted by a licensee under this chapter must state whether the taxes imposed by this chapter have been paid.

History.

(§ 15 ch 187 SLA 1955; am § 11 ch 109 SLA 2003)

Sec. 43.50.140.
Disposition of proceeds.

The proceeds derived from the payment of taxes, fees, and penalties under AS

43.50.010

—

43.50.180

, and the license fees received by the department shall be paid into a state fund entitled “School Fund,” and shall be used exclusively to rehabilitate, construct, and repair the state’s school facilities, and for costs of insurance on buildings comprising school facilities during the rehabilitation, construction, and repair, and for the life of the buildings.

History.

(§ 16 ch 187 SLA 1955)

Opinions of attorney general. —

In order to insure that tobacco tax funds are used most effectively in being a part of major rehabilitation, construction and major repair projects, the law requires that expenditures from such funds be made only after study and concurrence by the city school board, the city council, and the commissioner of education (now Department of Education). 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 24.

It is necessary for the city council to concur by resolution in any expenditure of tobacco tax funds. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 24.

In addition to the approval of the city council, any disbursement of tobacco tax funds must be made with the authorization of the local school board. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 24.

Sec. 43.50.145.
Notification of noncompliance; confiscation of noncomplying cigarettes. [Repealed, § 4 ch 103 SLA 2003.]

Sec. 43.50.150.
Administration and regulatory authority; cooperation with municipalities.

The department shall

administer this chapter; and

collect, supervise, and enforce the collection of taxes due under this chapter and penalties as provided in AS 43.05.

The department may adopt regulations necessary for the administration of this chapter.

The department may enter into an agreement with a municipality that imposes a tax on cigarettes or other tobacco products for the purpose of jointly auditing a person liable for a tax under AS

43.50.010

—

43.50.390

and the municipal tax on cigarettes or other tobacco products.

The department may enter into an agreement with a municipality that collects a tax on cigarettes through the use of a stamp similar to that used by the department under AS

43.50.500

to distribute and collect money for the stamps issued by the municipality on behalf of the municipality in conjunction with the distribution and sale of stamps under AS

43.50.500

—

43.50.700

. An agreement under this subsection must provide for the municipality to reimburse the department for the cost of distributing the municipality’s stamps and collecting the money for those stamps.

Notwithstanding AS

40.25.100(a)

and AS

43.05.230(a)

, the department may furnish the proper officer or representative of a municipality the tax returns or reports filed with the department under this chapter if the municipality grants substantially similar privileges to the department, provides adequate safeguards for the confidentiality of the returns and reports, and uses the returns and reports only for tax purposes.

History.

(§ 17 ch 187 SLA 1955; am § 39 ch 113 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 15 AAC 50, art. 1.

For taxation, see 15 AAC 50, art. 2.

Sec. 43.50.160.
Criminal penalties. [Repealed, § 46 ch 113 SLA 1980.
For current law, see AS 43.05.290.]

Sec. 43.50.170.
Definitions.

In AS

43.50.010

—

43.50.180

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“buyer” means a person who imports or acquires cigarettes for the person’s own consumption from any source other than a manufacturer, distributor, direct-buying retailer, retailer, or wholesaler-distributor;

“cigarette” means a roll for smoking of any size or shape, made wholly or partly of tobacco, whether the tobacco is flavored, adulterated, or mixed with another ingredient, if the wrapper or cover of the roll is made of paper or a material other than tobacco;

“direct-buying retailer” means a person who is engaged in the sale of cigarettes at retail in this state and who brings cigarettes or causes cigarettes to be brought into the state that are not purchased from a wholesaler-distributor;

“distributor” means a person who brings cigarettes that are not purchased from a wholesaler-distributor, or has cigarettes that are not purchased from a wholesaler-distributor brought, into the state, and who sells or distributes at least 75 percent of the cigarettes to others for resale in the state;

“licensee” means a person licensed under AS

43.50.010

—

43.50.180

;

“manufacturer” means a person who makes, fashions, or produces cigarettes for sale to distributors or other persons;

“person” includes an individual, company, partnership, limited liability partnership, joint venture, joint agreement, limited liability company, association, mutual or otherwise, corporation, estate, trust, business trust, receiver, trustee, syndicate, or political subdivision of this state, or combination acting as a unit;

“place of business” means a place where cigarettes are sold, or where cigarettes are brought or kept for the purpose of sale or consumption, including a vessel, vehicle, airplane, or train;

“retailer” means a person in the state who is engaged in the business of selling cigarettes at retail;

“sale” includes a sale, barter, exchange, and every other manner of transferring the ownership of personal property;

“tobacco product” has the meaning given in AS

43.50.390

;

“wholesaler-distributor” means a person outside this state who sells or distributes cigarettes into this state, who is not required to be licensed under AS

43.50.010

, and who is licensed under AS

43.50.035

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 187 SLA 1955; am § 27 ch 70 SLA 1964; am § 5 ch 125 SLA 1988; am §§ 12, 13 ch 109 SLA 2003; am §§ 14 — 17 ch 1 FSSLA 2004; am § 45 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Sec. 43.50.180.
Short title.

AS

43.50.010

—

43.50.180

may be cited as the Cigarette Tax Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 187 SLA 1955)